Washington statutes.
RCW 32.16.097

Penalty for violation of order issued under RCW 32.16.093.

Any present or former trustee, board director, officer, or employee of a savings bank or holding company or any other person against whom there is outstanding an effective final order issued under RCW 32.16.093, which order has been served upon the person, and who, in violation of the order, (1) participates in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the savings bank or holding company involved; or (2) directly or indirectly solicits or procures, transfers or attempts to transfer, or votes or attempts to vote any proxies, consents, or authorizations with respect to any voting rights in the savings bank or holding company; or (3) without the prior approval of the director, votes for a board trustee or director or serves or acts as a trustee, director, officer, employee, or agent of any savings bank or holding company, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be punishable as prescribed under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2010 c 88 s 55; 1994 c 92 s 334; 1979 c 46 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1979 c 46: See note following RCW 32.04.250.